Utah statutes.
58-69-804.   Form of practice.
(1)  A dentist licensed under this chapter may engage in practice as a
dentist, or in the practice of dentistry only as an individual licensee, but
as an individual licensee, he may be:
(a)  an individual operating as a business proprietor;
(b)  an employee of another person;
(c)  a partner in a lawfully organized partnership;
(d)  a lawfully formed professional corporation;
(e)  a lawfully organized limited liability company;
(f)  a lawfully organized business corporation; or
(g)  any other form of organization recognized by the state which is not
prohibited by rule adopted by division rules made in collaboration with the
board.
(2)  Regardless of the form in which a licensee engages in the practice of
dentistry, the licensee may not permit another person who is not licensed in
Utah as a dentist and is not otherwise competent to engage in the practice of
dentistry to direct, or in any other way participate in, or interfere in the
licensee's practice of dentistry.
